Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Task Force on Specialty Courts is established.
(2) The task force consists of 19 members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint five members as follows:
(A) Two members who are district attorneys, or the designees of district attorneys.
(B) Two members who are behavioral health providers.
(C) One member representing veterans.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint six members as follows:
(A) Two members who are employed as public defenders.
(B) One member representing the Oregon Youth Authority.
(C) Two members representing county governing  bodies, one from a county with a pop-
ulation of over 300,000, and one from a county with a population of less than 50,000.
(D) One member representing the Department of Human Services.
(c) The Governor shall appoint four members as follows:
(A) One member representing the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission.
(B) One member representing either the Oregon Health Authority  or a coordinated care
organization representing a payer.
(C) One member who is a community corrections director.
(D) One member who is a law enforcement officer.
(d) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint four members as follows:
(A) Three members representing the Judicial Department.
(B) One member representing a housing or other social services  provider that has part-
nered with a drug court.
(3) The task force shall study the following issues concerning specialty courts:
(a) Identification of the most appropriate funding mechanism to ensure long-term sta-
bility of specialty courts within this state.
(b) Determining the administrative and funding balance between the Oregon  Criminal
Justice Commission and the Judicial Department.
Enrolled House Bill 4001 (HB 4001-A) Page 1
(c) Determining whether specialty courts currently use the right eligibility metrics,  in-
cluding whether current  metrics are accurately capturing those individuals who would ben-
efit from a drug court program.
(d) Identification  of the appropriate accountability mechanism to ensure that specialty
courts are operating according to the standards of the commission.
(4) A majority of the members of the  task force constitutes a quorum for the transaction
of business.
(5) Official action by the task force requires the approval of a majority of the  members
of the task force.
(6) The task force shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(8) The task force shall meet at times and places specified by the call  of the chairperson
or of a majority of the members of the task force.
(9) The task force may adopt rules necessary for the operation of the task force.
(10) No later than November 15, 2024,  the task force shall submit a report on its findings
and recommendations, which may include  recommendations for legislation, in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to
the judiciary.
(11) The Legislative Policy and Research Director shall provide staff  support to the task
force.
(12) Members of the  task force are not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for
expenses and serve as volunteers on the task force.
(13) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the task force in the performance  of the duties of the task force and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish information and advice the members of the
task force consider necessary to perform their duties.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on December 31, 2024.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4001 (HB 4001-A) Page 2
Passed by House February 29, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4001 (HB 4001-A) Page 3